Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 9.1 Registration of Voters
17-9.1-19.
Single registration.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any voter to reregister if he or she is already registered in the city or town in which the voter has his or her residence, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

. A voter shall have no more than one voter registration. Any voter who is registered more than once shall be deemed to have authorized the cancellation of all registrations other than the most recent, provided that nothing in this section shall be taken to validate any registration which is not a city or town where the voter has his or her residence.

The local board of canvassers of each city or town shall review their voter registration files on a quarterly basis in accordance with regulations adopted by the secretary of state for the purpose of removing duplicate voter registrations in the central voter registration system for any voter registered in their city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 178, § 1.

17-9.1-20.
False affidavits.

Every person who makes a false affidavit under this chapter shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-21.
Registration lists furnished to political parties.

The local boards shall not more than once a month, if requested to do so by the state and/or city or town chairperson of any political party, or any state or local office holder or declared candidate for public office, furnish without cost and without unreasonable delay to the chairperson, or the chairperson’s accredited representative, and to any state or local office holder or declared candidate for public office so requesting, the names and addresses of all persons who are newly registered to vote in the city or town, the names and addresses of all electors who have transferred to a new voting address, and the names and addresses of all persons whose names have been removed from the voting list or placed in the inactive category. In the event that any list so furnished is declared to be inaccurate by the chairperson of the democratic state committee or the chairperson of the republican state central committee, the state board of elections shall, at its discretion, if requested by either of the chairpersons, appoint a disinterested person to examine the records of the local board for the purpose of determining the accuracy of the list. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent any member of the general public from obtaining the same information under the access to Public Records Acts, chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2002, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 454, § 1.

17-9.1-22.
Tampering with registration records.

Every person who willfully and without lawful authority destroys, secretes, removes, defaces, alters, tampers, or meddles with the original or any duplicate registration card after any entry has been lawfully made in it, or any official list of registered voters compiled from the registration cards to be used by any local board or office of the secretary of state in connection with the conduct of any election or the mailing of any election materials, shall be guilty of a felony.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-23.
Party designation.

Whenever any person registers to vote, that person may designate his or her party affiliation, or that person may designate that he or she is not affiliated with any political party. The information shall be recorded on a form prescribed by the state board of elections.

Any person who is already registered to vote and wishes to designate his or her party affiliation may do so by submitting to that person’s local board of canvassers a form provided by the state board designating his or her party affiliation and certifying to the fact on the form furnished for that purpose.

Whenever any person participates in a party primary, that act shall serve as identifying the person as being affiliated with the party in whose primary that person has participated and the local board shall record the affiliation on the appropriate form. For the purposes of this section, “participating in a party primary” does not include the circulation or signing of nomination papers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 141, § 1.

17-9.1-24.
Change of designation.

Any person who has designated his or her party affiliation pursuant to §

17-9.1-23

may change the designation on or before the thirtieth day preceding any primary election for which the person is eligible. Whenever any person desires to change his or her party designation, that person shall submit to the local board of the city or town in which that person has his or her residence, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

, or before the clerk or other duly authorized agent of the board, and shall change his or her party designation and, after the information has been recorded on the form furnished for that purpose, the person shall sign his or her name and certify to the truth of the facts recorded in the appropriate spaces in the form. For the convenience of persons voting at a primary election, forms for changing party designation shall be available at all primary polling places. The presence of the forms at the primary polling place shall not be construed to allow a person to change his or her party designation within thirty (30) days preceding the primary election.

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 109, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 141, § 1.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 109, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 141, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2000, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 141, § 1.

17-9.1-25.
Acknowledgement of registration or change of address — Verification of residence.

The local board of each city or town shall mail an acknowledgement notice to each newly registered voter and to each voter who changes his or her voting residence within seven (7) days after receipt of the registration or change of residence. The acknowledgement notice shall notify the applicant for registration of the disposition of the application, i.e., whether the application is deemed accepted or denied. If denied, the reason for the denial shall be indicated on the notice. The acknowledgement notice shall be mailed to the applicant at the address from which he or she registered and shall be clearly marked: “Do Not Forward — Return If Undeliverable”. Provided, however, that the New Shoreham Board of Canvassers may address the acknowledgement notice, and any other notice that may be required by this chapter, to the person’s post office box if said post office box is located within the confines of New Shoreham. Provided, further that in any other city or town in which some postal customers are not eligible to receive home mail delivery from the United States postal service, and the respective streets and street ranges are certified as such to the secretary of state, the city or town shall address the acknowledgment card and any other notice that may be required by this chapter to the United States postal service post office box at which the voter receives mail.

The acknowledgement form shall be of a size and other specifications that shall be determined by the state board and shall be substantially in the following form; provided, that the wording of the form may be revised and updated from time to time by the state board in a manner to make its content as easily readable and understandable as possible:

The form may also contain any other information that may be required by the state board.

Those notices that are returned as undeliverable to the local board shall be reviewed to verify that the address was correctly printed on the notice. All notices returned as undeliverable shall be attached to the registration notices and maintained as a record of the local board.

Any voter whose application to register to vote has been accepted, but whose acknowledgement notice has been returned by postal authorities as undeliverable, shall be placed on an inactive list of voters and shall not be permitted to vote unless an affirmation form is completed. The local board shall be required, upon receipt of the undeliverable acknowledgement notice, to commence the confirmation process described in §

17-9.1-26

.

Your application to register to vote has been received and accepted. The following is information concerning your voting districts. Your U.S. Representative District is Your State Senate District is Your Representative District is Your Council District is Your Ward District is Your Voting District is Locations of polling places for these districts may be obtained from newspaper advertisements preceding each election or by calling your local board. Your application to register to vote has been received incomplete. Please contact our office at the telephone number or address listed below. Your application to register to vote has been rejected because If this card is addressed to a person who does not live at this address, please ask your mail carrier to return it to the sender. Board of Canvassers Address Telephone Number

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 113, § 1.

17-9.1-26.
Confirmation process — Verification of the address of registered voter.

Whenever: (i) An acknowledgement card that was mailed to a voter whose application to register to vote has been accepted is returned as undeliverable; (ii) Through the periodic updating of voter registration records as provided in §

17-9.1-27

, a change of address is detected for any voter; (iii) As the result of a challenge under §

17-9.1-28

, the challenged voter fails to appear before the local board; or (iv) A mailing by the jury commissioner to a voter is returned as undeliverable; the local board shall begin the confirmation process described in subsection (b) of this section.

Whenever any other official mailing, from either the state board or a local board or from the office of the secretary of state, which official mailing has been sent to at least a majority of the registered voters in a particular city or town, is returned as undeliverable to any one or more of the voters to whom it was mailed, the local board may commence the confirmation process described in subsection (b) of this section.

The confirmation notice shall be sent by first-class, forwardable mail and shall be of any size or other specifications that shall be determined by the state board. The notice shall include a voter registration form that may be used by the voter to verify or correct the voter’s residence address for voting purposes.

The confirmation notice shall be prepared in substantially the following form and shall contain substantially the following information, subject to any additional information as may be required by the state board; provided, that the wording of the form may be revised and updated from time to time by the state board in a manner to make its content as easily readable and understandable as possible:

The board of canvassers has received information that you may no longer reside at the address from which you are currently registered. If you have not permanently changed your residence address, or if you have permanently changed your residence address but continue to live in the same city or town, you should immediately return the voter registration form no later than fourteen (14) days after the date of this mailing even if this notice was mailed to your correct current address. If the voter registration form is not returned, affirmation or confirmation of your current address may be required at the polls on election day. If the registration form is not returned and you do not vote by
_______________ , which is the date of the second general election following the date of this mailing, then your name may be removed from the voter registration list. If you have permanently changed residence address to another city or town in Rhode Island, please complete and return the
completed voter registration form to the local board of canvassers in the city or town of your current address.

The confirmation notice shall be mailed to both the voter’s current registered address and any new residence address, to the extent both addresses are available to the local board.

If a confirmation notice is mailed to a voter and returned as undeliverable, or if delivered and the voter has not responded within fourteen (14) days from the date of the mailing, the voter shall remain on, or be placed on, the inactive list and shall not be permitted to vote until the voter has signed an affirmation form at either the approved polling place or at the local board of canvassers as provided in this chapter. Any application for a mail ballot under §

17-20-2.1

or an emergency mail ballot under §

17-20-2.2

shall serve as a proper affirmation form under this section if the address is the same as the voter’s current address on record with the board of canvassers. If the voter fails to vote by the second general election following the date of the confirmation mailing, then the voter shall be removed from the voting list. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, if the confirmation mailing was based upon the change of address information provided by or through the United States Postal Service National Change of Address Program, and the voter has failed to respond to the confirmation mailing, the voter shall remain on the active list of voters and shall not be required to sign the affirmation form. In these cases, the voter’s residence address for voting purposes will be changed by the local board to the new address as indicated by the National Change of Address Program.

Local boards shall be required to maintain for a period of at least two (2) years a record of all outgoing confirmation mailings, including the reasons for the mailing of the confirmations. Records shall be kept in a fashion that may be determined by the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 235, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 257, § 1.

17-9.1-27.
Periodic updating of voter registration records.

Not less than four (4) times within a calendar year, the secretary of state shall update the central voter register using the United States Postal Service National Change of Address (NCOA) Program. The office of the secretary of state shall be responsible for obtaining the NCOA data and providing each local board of canvassers with their data; provided, that the updating shall be performed by each local board. The NCOA list of address changes shall be compared by the local board with lists of registered voters, and if address changes are detected for any voter, the local board shall institute the confirmation process described in §

17-9.1-26

.

Each local board of canvassers in each city or town shall send annually, a notice prescribed by the secretary of state and marked “Do Not Forward — Return if Undeliverable”, to every active registered voter who has not voted in the past five (5) calendar years and has not otherwise communicated with the board during that period of time, advising them of their current polling place and voting eligibility, and informing them that mail that is returned as undeliverable will initiate the confirmation process described in §

17-9.1-26

; provided, however, that the local boards shall not be obligated to send such notice if the state or federal government fails to appropriate the necessary funds.

The secretary of state shall promulgate regulations for the uniform implementation of this section, consistent with all applicable federal voting laws.

Beginning ninety (90) days before any state election and through certification of that election, local boards shall cease all list maintenance procedures required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 2, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 2, effective June 7, 2022.

17-9.1-28.
Procedure on challenge of registration.

Any elector may challenge the registration of a registered voter by submitting to the local board an affidavit prescribed by the state board of elections in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the board stating that the voter is not eligible to vote and setting forth evidence that would create a reasonable cause to suspect that the challenged voter is not in fact eligible. The return as undeliverable of a mailing sent to the voter by someone other than the state board or local board shall not, standing alone, constitute reasonable cause. The local board, upon receipt of the affidavit and upon finding that the affidavit establishes reasonable cause, shall cause to be mailed, by certified mail, a notification of the challenge to the challenged voter at his or her registered address. The return of the notice or acknowledgement of its receipt may be admitted as evidence at the hearing. The challenged voter shall appear before the local board at a time and place to be determined by the local board. The objector shall also be notified of the hearing. If the board finds that the affidavit does set forth reasonable cause to suspect that the challenged voter is not eligible, the voter, upon taking the following oath or affirmation, shall answer pertinent questions as provided in this section, and any other questions necessary to establish his or her eligibility.

The oath or affirmation shall be as follows:

“You do voluntarily swear (or affirm) that you will fully and truly answer all questions put to you regarding your place of residence and eligibility as an elector.”

The local board shall then ask the voter the following questions which are appropriate to test his or her eligibility:

If challenged as ineligible of the ground that he or she is not a citizen: Where were you born? If you were not born in the United States, when and where were you naturalized as a United States citizen?

If challenged as ineligible on the ground that he or she has not resided in this state for thirty (30) days immediately preceding the election:

How long have you resided in this state immediately preceding your registration?

Have you been absent from this state within the thirty (30) days immediately preceding this election? If yes, then:

When you left, did you leave for a temporary purpose, with the intent of returning, or for the purpose of remaining away?

What state or territory did you regard as your residence while absent?

Did you, while absent, vote in any other state or territory?

Have you registered to vote at any other place within or outside of this state?

Have you applied for an absentee ballot at any place in this or any other state?

What is the address furnished to the division of motor vehicles for your operator’s license?

What is the address from which your motor vehicle is registered?

What is the address from which you filed your last federal income tax return?

What is the address from which you filed your last state income tax return?

What is the address furnished to the companies from which you have obtained retail credit cards?

What is the address furnished to the financial institutions where you maintain accounts?

What is the address furnished to the tax collector and/or assessor in those communities where you own taxable real or personal property for the purposes of notification to you?

What is the address furnished to the insurance companies with which you maintain policies?

What is the address furnished to your employer?

What is the address furnished by you to any business, professional, union, or fraternal organizations of which you are a member?

What is the address furnished to the governmental agencies with which you have contact?

(4)

If challenged as ineligible on the ground that registrant is under eighteen (18) years of age: What is your date of birth?

(5)

If challenged as ineligible on the ground registrant has been finally convicted of a felony:

(i)

Have you ever been tried or convicted in this state or any other state of any crime? If yes, then:

(ii)

Of what crime, when, and in what court were you convicted?

(iii)

What sentence was imposed, including provisions relating to probation and parole, and have the provisions of the sentence been fulfilled?

(6)

The local board shall ask the challenged person any other and further questions to test his or her eligibility as an elector which the board deems relevant.

If challenged as ineligible on the ground that he or she is not a resident of the district where seeking to vote:

(i)

When did you last come into this district?

(ii)

Did you come for a temporary purpose only, or for the purpose of making it your residence?

(iii)

Did you come into this district solely for the purpose of voting here?

(iv)

Have you now and have you had for the last thirty (30) days a voting residence in this district? If so, what is the particular description, name and location of your residence?

(v)

If the answer to paragraph (iv) of this subdivision is no, then: Have you moved from the district after registering?

If the challenged voter appears at the hearing and testifies under oath or affirmation as provided and the local board determines that the voter is not eligible to vote or not eligible to vote within the city or town, the voter may be stricken from the voting list. If the voter is found to be eligible to vote within the city or town but not within the voting district where the voter is currently registered, the voter shall remain on the voting list and the board shall record the voter’s change of address to the new voting district within the same city or town. If the voter does not appear at the hearing, whether or not the notification of the challenge is returned as undeliverable, the voter shall not be stricken from the voting list, but the board shall at that time be required to begin the confirmation process described in §

17-9.1-26

. No confirmation mailing shall be sent out and no person shall be removed from the voting list within the ninety (90) day period prior to any election, except that names of voters may be removed from the voting list within that period of time, at the request of the voter, by reason of criminal conviction or mental incapacity, or by reason of the voter’s death. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the mailing of acknowledgement cards verifying voter registration applications within the ninety (90) day period, and nothing contained in this section shall prevent the recording within the ninety (90) day period of a change of address of a voter who has changed voting residence within the same city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-29.
Penalty for unsubstantiated challenge.

Every person who willfully and maliciously challenges the registration of a voter without reasonable cause to suspect that the voter is not qualified shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, in addition, be liable to the challenged voter for compensatory and punitive damages as well as for his or her counsel fees. The mere fact that a challenge was not sustained by the board shall not give rise to any civil or criminal liability of the objector.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-30.
Appeal of ruling by board of canvassers.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the general laws to the contrary, all appeals from decisions rendered by the board of canvassers of the various cities and towns regarding the eligibility of a person to vote shall be to the state board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-31.
Voter registration advisory board.

The state board of elections shall establish a voter registration advisory board, subsequently referred to as the advisory board, to assist in the drafting of regulations and the monitoring of implementation of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C. § 1973gg et seq., and to help recruit and train the volunteer registrars. The advisory board shall issue an annual report to the state board, governor, and general assembly on its activities.

The advisory board shall consist of eighteen (18) members. The governor shall appoint one member from the League of Women Voters, one member of the Urban League, one member of Common Cause, one member of Ocean State Action, one member of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, one member of the R.I. Black Caucus of State Legislators, and one representative of a state employees’ union. The speaker of the house shall appoint two (2) members, not more than one from the majority party. The president of the senate shall appoint two (2) members, not more than one from the majority party. In addition, the following shall be members: the secretary of state or her or his designee; the directors or their designees of the division of motor vehicles, the department of human services, the department of health, and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; and the chairpersons or their designees of the governor’s commission on disabilities and the governor’s commission on Hispanic affairs. The members shall annually elect a chairperson and other officers as are necessary.

Of the number of members originally appointed under this section, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of one year to be chosen by lot; one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years, to be chosen by lot; and one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, to be chosen by lot. Thereafter, vacancies created by expiration of terms shall be filled with appointments for terms of three (3) years. Members whose terms expire may be reappointed to succeed themselves. The members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation for their services, but may, at the discretion of the governor, be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses actually incurred in the performance of their official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 19; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 94.

17-9.1-32.
Private voter registration — State departments and agencies.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to prohibit private voter registration activities in the public areas of state departments and agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 171, § 4.

17-9.1-33.
Age.

Every person who has reached the age of eighteen (18) years or who is seventeen (17) years of age and will be eighteen (18) years of age by the date of the next election, and is otherwise qualified to register may do so for that election.

A person who is otherwise qualified to register and is at least sixteen (16) years of age, but will not be eighteen (18) years of age by the date of the next election, may preregister upon satisfactory proof of age and shall be automatically registered upon reaching eighteen (18) years of age.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 390, § 1.

17-9.1-34.
Electronic registration of voters.

The secretary of state shall establish, maintain, and administer a portal for electronic voter registration. An applicant may use such portal to register to vote, or to update existing voter registration information, provided:

The applicant’s information is verifiable in the manner described in subsection (b) of this section;

The applicant’s signature is in a database described in subsection (b) of this section; and

Such signature may be imported into such system for electronic voter registration.

Upon request of the secretary of state, a state agency, quasi-public agency, or municipality shall provide information to the secretary of state that the secretary of state deems necessary to maintain the system for electronic voter registration, and the information so obtained shall be used for no other purpose. The secretary of state shall verify applicant information by cross-referencing information submitted by applicants with data or information contained in any state agency’s, quasi-public agency’s, or municipality’s database or a database administered by the federal government, or any voter registration database of another state. The secretary of state shall not use the information obtained from any such databases except to verify information submitted by the applicant. The applicant’s signature, if part of the data contained in the state agency’s, quasi-public agency’s, or municipality’s database, shall be included as part of the applicant’s information contained in the system for electronic voter registration. No information viewed or received by the secretary of state pursuant to this subsection may be transferred to, shared with, or otherwise conveyed to any other governmental or non-governmental entity for any reason except for voter registration purposes or pursuant to a court order.

The submission of an electronic application shall contain all of the information that is required for an application under §

17-9.1-9

, with the exception of the signature, which shall be obtained from another state agency, quasi-public agency, or municipality’s database pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

An applicant using the system shall mark the box associated with the following statement included as part of the electronic application:

“By clicking on the box below, I swear or affirm all of the following under penalty of perjury:

I am the person whose name and identifying information is provided on this form, and I desire to register to vote or update my voter registration information in the state of Rhode Island.

All of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct as of the date I am submitting this form.

I authorize a Rhode Island state agency, quasi-public agency, or municipality to transmit, for voter registration purposes, to the secretary of state and my city’s/town’s board of canvassers my signature that is on file with such state agency, quasi-public agency, or municipality. I understand that the secretary of state and my city’s/town’s board of canvassers will use such signature on this electronic voter registration application as if I had signed this form personally.”

Upon approval of such application, the boards of canvassers shall send a confirmation notice to the applicant.

The secretary of state may enter into an agreement and exchange information or data with any other state exclusively for the purposes of updating the statewide central voter register and registering voters, provided such activities are performed under the supervision of the secretary of state and the secretary of state enters into an agreement to protect the confidentiality of such information or data. A Rhode Island state agency shall provide the secretary of state with information or data to be used exclusively for voter registration purposes and shall advise the secretary of state if such information or data is held confidential. The secretary of state shall not use or transmit the information or data for any purpose except for voter registration purposes or pursuant to a court order.

To ensure full, equal, and independent access to all voters with disabilities, any internet site and voter registration form created to register voters electronically or allow voters to update their voter registration shall comply with all requirements under Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131-12165, and Web Content Accessibility Guidelines (WCAG) 2.0 compliance level AA. Experts concerning disability and usability access to websites shall be included in the development of any voter registration website and voter registration form, and shall verify accessibility and usability before the website, or an updated version of the website, is made available to the general public.

The website and form shall be available in any language required by federal or state voting rights laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 7, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 8, § 2.